District of Columbia statutes.
42-3201

Notice to quit — Unnecessary with lease for certain term; landlord’s right to immediate possession.

When real estate is leased for a certain term no notice to quit shall be necessary, but the landlord shall be entitled to the possession, without such notice, immediately upon the expiration of the term.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1382, ch. 854, § 1218
Alterations to units after notice to vacate, prohibition, see § 6-731.01 et seq.
Ejectment proceedings, see § 16-1110.
1981 Ed., § 45-1401.
1973 Ed., § 45-901.